Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-911
Budget; income from taxation; limitation.

The amounts required to be raised by taxation for the various offices, departments, activities, and funds of the county, as provided in said budget as adopted, shall not exceed the existing statutory or constitutional limitations relating thereto, and shall be the amount levied by the county board for the purposes designated in said budget.

Laws 1937, c. 56, § 7, p. 227;

Laws 1939, c. 24, § 5, p. 130;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-2107;

R.S.1943, § 23-911.